California statutes. Financial Code
(b) This section does not exempt a foreign (other state) industrial loan company or any subsidiary, as defined in Section 189 of the Corporations Code, from complying with all other laws and regulations
 governing the business in which the industrial loan company or subsidiary is engaged.

(c) This section creates and authorizes an exempt class of persons pursuant to Section 1 of Article XV of the California Constitution.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 479, Sec. 7.   Effective October 2, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

18666.

The commissioner is authorized to adopt rules to implement this chapter similar to regulations adopted by the Superintendent of Banks under similar provisions of law contained in Division 1 (commencing with Section 99), and for the same or similar reasons regulations are adopted by the Superintendent of Banks. The authority granted to the commissioner by this section is in addition to the authority granted to the commissioner under Section 18347.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 479, Sec. 7.   Effective October 2, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Facilities of Insured Foreign (Other State) Industrial Loan Companies [18670. - 18675.]

18670.

No provision of this article applies to an insured foreign (other state) industrial loan company that maintains a California branch office.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 479, Sec. 7.   Effective October 2, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

18671.

(a) No foreign (other state) industrial loan company may establish or maintain an office in this state at which it engages in noncore industrial loan company business unless the industrial loan company complies with this article and applicable provisions of Article 1 (commencing with Section 18660).

(b) (1) No person may establish or maintain an office in this state as representative of an insured foreign (other state) industrial loan company unless the
 industrial loan company complies with this article and applicable provisions of Article 1 (commencing with Section 18660).

(2) For purposes of this article, if any person establishes or maintains an office in this state as representative of an insured foreign (other state) industrial loan company, the insured foreign (other state) industrial loan company is deemed to establish and maintain the office as a facility.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 479, Sec. 7.   Effective October 2, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

18672.

Not less than 30 days before an insured foreign (other state) industrial loan company establishes a facility, it shall file with the commissioner a report and the appointment called for in Section 18673.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 479, Sec. 7.   Effective October 2, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

18673.

(a) Not less than 30 days before establishing a facility, an insured foreign (other state) industrial loan company shall file with the commissioner, in the form that the commissioner may by rule or order require, an appointment irrevocably appointing the commissioner and the commissioner’s successor from time to time in office to be the industrial loan company’s attorney to receive service of any lawful process in any noncriminal judicial or administrative proceeding against the industrial loan company or any of its successors that arises
 out of the activities in this state of the facility after the appointment has been filed, with the same force and validity as if served personally on the industrial loan company or its successors, as the case may be.

(b) Any insured foreign (other state) industrial loan company that maintains a facility and that has not filed with the commissioner an appointment pursuant to subdivision (a) is deemed by the maintenance of the facility to have appointed the commissioner as its attorney to receive service of any lawful process in any noncriminal judicial or administrative proceeding against the industrial loan company or any of its successors that arises out of the activities in this state of the facility, with the same force and validity as if served personally on the industrial loan company or its successor, as the case may be.

(c) Service may be made on an insured foreign (other
 state) industrial loan company that has appointed or is deemed to have appointed the commissioner as its attorney for service of process by leaving a copy of the process at any office of the commissioner. However, the service is not effective unless (1) the party making the service, who may be the commissioner, forthwith sends notice of the service and a copy of the process by registered or certified mail to the industrial loan company served at the last address on file with the commissioner for any of the industrial loan company’s offices in this state or at its head office, and (2) an affidavit of compliance with this subdivision by the party making the service is filed in the case on or before the return date, if any, or within any further time that the court, in the case of a judicial proceeding, or the administrative agency, in the case of an administrative proceeding, allows.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 479, Sec. 7.   Effective October 2, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

18674.

Not less than 30 days before an insured foreign (other state) industrial loan company relocates a facility, it shall file a report with the commissioner.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 479, Sec. 7.   Effective October 2, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

18675.

Not less than 30 days before an insured foreign (other state) industrial loan company closes a facility, it shall file a report with the commissioner.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 479, Sec. 7.   Effective October 2, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. California Branch Offices [18680. - 18687.]

18680.

No foreign (other state) industrial loan company may transact core business in this state except at a branch office established in accordance with federal law and the law of the domicile of the industrial loan company.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 479, Sec. 7.   Effective October 2, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

18681.

Section 18680 does not prohibit:

(a) Any foreign (other state) industrial loan company which does not maintain a California branch office from carrying on the activities described in subdivision (d) of Section 191 of the Corporations Code.

(b) Any foreign (other state) industrial loan company which does not maintain a California branch office from making in this state loans secured by liens on real property located in this
 state.

(c) Any foreign (other state) industrial loan company from having a California industrial loan company as its agent pursuant to Article 5 (commencing with Section 18700).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 887, Sec. 55.   Effective September 25, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

18682.

No foreign (other state) industrial loan company may establish or maintain a California branch office unless it is qualified to transact intrastate business in this state under Chapter 21 (commencing with Section 2100) of Division 1 of Title 1 of the Corporations Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 479, Sec. 7.   Effective October 2, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

18683.

No foreign (other state) industrial loan company may establish or maintain a California branch office unless the industrial loan company is insured.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 479, Sec. 7.   Effective October 2, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

18684.

(a) (1) No foreign (other state) industrial loan company may merge as the surviving corporation (Section 148) with a California industrial loan company or California bank except that an insured foreign (other state) industrial loan company may do so in accordance with federal law, the law of the domicile of the foreign (other state) industrial loan company, this chapter, and Division 1.5 (commencing with Section 4800).

(2) No foreign (other state)
 industrial loan company may purchase the whole business unit of a California industrial loan company or California bank except that an insured foreign (other state) industrial loan company may do so in accordance with federal law, the law of the domicile of the foreign (other state) industrial loan company, this chapter and Division 1.5 (commencing with Section 4800).

(3) No foreign (other state) industrial loan company that does not already maintain a California branch office may establish or maintain a California branch office except in the manner described in paragraph (1) or (2) and in accordance with federal law, the law of the domicile of the foreign (other state) industrial loan company and this chapter.

(b) This section constitutes:

(1) An election to permit early interstate merger transactions pursuant to
 Section 44(a)(3) of the Federal Deposit Insurance Act (12 U.S.C. Sec. 1831u(a)(3)).

(2) An express prohibition against interstate branching through the acquisition of a branch business unit located in this state of a California industrial loan company or California bank (without acquisition of the whole business unit of the California industrial loan company or California bank) pursuant to Section 44(a)(4) of the Federal Deposit Insurance Act (12 U.S.C. Sec. 1831u(a)(4)).

(3) An express prohibition against interstate branching through de novo establishment of California branch offices pursuant to Section 5155 of the Revised Statutes (12 U.S.C. Sec. 36) or Section 18(d) of the Federal Deposit Insurance Act (12 U.S.C. Sec. 1828(d)).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 887, Sec. 56.   Effective September 25, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

18685.

(a) No foreign (other state) industrial loan company that does not already maintain a California branch office may:

(1) Merge as the surviving corporation (Section 148) with a California industrial loan company or California bank pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 18684 unless the California industrial loan company or California bank has been in existence for at least five years.

(2) Purchase the whole business unit, of a California industrial loan company or California bank pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 18684 unless the California industrial loan company or California bank has been in existence for at least five years.

(b) For purposes of this section, a California industrial loan company or California bank that is established solely for the purpose of, and does not open for business prior to, acquiring the whole business unit of a second California industrial loan company or California bank through a merger or purchase is deemed to have been in existence for the same period of time as the second California industrial loan company or California bank.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 887, Sec. 57.   Effective September 25, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

18687.

(a) No foreign (other state) industrial loan company that maintains a California branch office may transact at the branch office any business that it is not authorized to transact or is prohibited from transacting under the law of its domicile or that industrial loan companies organized and licensed under the laws of this state are not authorized to transact or are prohibited from transacting.

(b) Whenever any provision of this chapter or of any rule or order issued under this
 chapter which is applicable to or with respect to a foreign (other state) industrial loan company that maintains a California branch office is inconsistent with any provision of any other chapter of this division, the former provision applies, and the latter provision does not apply.

(History: Added by Stats. 1995, Ch. 479, Sec. 7.   Effective October 2, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. California Industrial Loan Company as Principal [18690. - 18697.]

18690.

Notwithstanding the provisions of Sections 18147 and 18165, a California industrial loan company may, with the prior approval of the commissioner and subject to any rules that the commissioner may prescribe, have an insured depository institution engage in authorized agency activities as its agent.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 887, Sec. 59.   Effective September 25, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

18691.

An application by a California industrial loan company for approval to have an insured depository institution engage in authorized agency activities as its agent shall be in the form, shall contain the information, shall be signed in the manner, and shall, if the commissioner requires by rule or order, be verified in the manner that the commissioner may, by rule or order, require.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 887, Sec. 60.   Effective September 25, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

18692.

An application by a California industrial loan company for approval to have an insured depository institution engage in authorized agency activities as its agent shall be accompanied by a filing fee of two hundred fifty dollars ($250).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 887, Sec. 61.   Effective September 25, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

18693.

In determining whether to approve or deny an application by a California industrial loan company for approval to have an insured depository institution engage in authorized agency activities as its agent, the commissioner shall consider both of the following:

(a) Whether the proposed agency arrangement is consistent with the safe and sound operation of the California industrial loan company.

(b) Any other factors that the
 commissioner deems relevant.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 887, Sec. 62.   Effective September 25, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

18694.

No California industrial loan company may have an insured depository institution conduct as its agent any activity that the California industrial loan company is prohibited from conducting itself.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 887, Sec. 63.   Effective September 25, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

18695.

No office of an insured depository institution that is performing authorized agency activities as agent for a California industrial loan company in accordance with this article shall, on that account, be deemed to be an office of the California industrial loan company.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 887, Sec. 64.   Effective September 25, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

18696.

If the commissioner finds that any activity performed by an insured depository institution as agent for a California industrial loan company is not an authorized agency activity or that the agency arrangement is inconsistent with safe and sound practices, the commissioner may order the California industrial loan company to terminate the agency arrangement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 887, Sec. 65.   Effective September 25, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

18697.

This article does not apply to a California industrial loan company’s having an insured depository institution engage in authorized agency activities as its agent in any case other than a case where, but for Section 18695, an office of the insured depository institution affiliate would for regulatory purposes be considered to be an office of the California industrial loan company.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 887, Sec. 66.   Effective September 25, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. California Industrial Loan Company as Agent [18700. - 18707.]

18700.

Notwithstanding the provisions of Sections 18147 and 18165, a California industrial loan company may, with the prior approval of the commissioner and subject to any rules that the commissioner may prescribe, engage in authorized agency activities as agent for an insured depository institution.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 887, Sec. 67.   Effective September 25, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

18701.

An application by a California industrial loan company for approval to engage in authorized agency activities as agent for an insured depository institution shall be in the form, shall contain the information, shall be signed in the manner, and shall, if the commissioner requires by rule or order, be verified in the manner that the commissioner may, by rule or order, require.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 887, Sec. 68.   Effective September 25, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

18702.

An application by a California industrial loan company for approval to engage in authorized agency activities as agent for an insured depository institution shall be accompanied by a filing fee of two hundred fifty dollars ($250).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 887, Sec. 69.   Effective September 25, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

18703.

In determining whether to approve or deny an application by a California industrial loan company for approval to engage in authorized agency activities as agent for an insured depository institution, the commissioner shall consider both of the following factors:

(a) Whether the proposed agency arrangement is consistent with the safe and sound operation of the California industrial loan company.

(b) Any other factors that the
 commissioner deems relevant.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 887, Sec. 70.   Effective September 25, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

18704.

No California industrial loan company may conduct any activity as an agent for an insured depository institution that the California industrial loan company would be prohibited from conducting as a principal.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 887, Sec. 71.   Effective September 25, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

18705.

(a) No office of a California industrial loan company that conducts authorized agency activities as agent for an insured depository institution in accordance with this article shall, on that account, be deemed to be an office of the insured depository institution.

(b) For purposes of this division, no insured depository institution that has a California industrial loan company engaged in authorized agency activities as its agent shall on that account be deemed to be
 transacting business in this state.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 887, Sec. 72.   Effective September 25, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

18706.

If the commissioner finds that any activities performed by a California industrial loan company as agent for an insured depository institution are not authorized agency activities or that the agency arrangement is inconsistent with safe and sound practices, the commissioner may order the California industrial loan company to terminate the agency arrangement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 887, Sec. 73.   Effective September 25, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

18707.

This article does not apply to a California industrial loan company’s engaging in authorized agency activities as agent for an insured depository institution in any case other than a case where, but for Section 18705, an office of the California industrial loan company would for regulatory purposes be considered to be an office of the insured depository institution.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 887, Sec. 74.   Effective September 25, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 8. PAWNBROKERS [21000. - 21413.]



CHAPTER 1. General Provisions [21000. - 21051.]



  ARTICLE 1. Definitions [21000. - 21003.]

21000.

Every person engaged in the business of receiving goods, including motor vehicles, in pledge as security for a loan is a pawnbroker within the meaning of this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 923, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

21000.7.

As used in this division “receiving goods as security for a loan” does not include a good faith purchase of goods.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 1037.)
-------------------------------------------

21001.

“Compensation” includes expenses, interest, disbursements, storage charges, and all other charges of any nature in connection with a loan or forbearance.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1951, Ch. 364.)
-------------------------------------------

21002.

(a) As used in this division, “pledged property” is property held as security for a loan, the title to which remains with the pledgor and has not passed to the pawnbroker pursuant to Section 21201.

(b) “Vested property” is property the title to which has been transferred from the pledgor to the pawnbroker pursuant to Section 21201. Vested property is not pledged property.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1128, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

21003.

For purposes of this division, the term “month” means a period of time consisting of 30 consecutive calendar days.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 318, Sec. 1.   (AB 424)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Exceptions to This Division [21050. - 21051.]

21050.

This division does not apply to any of the following:

(a) Any corporation organized for the purpose of securing credit from any federal intermediate credit bank organized and existing pursuant to the provisions of an act of Congress entitled “Agricultural Credits Act of 1923.”

(b) Any nonprofit cooperative corporation or association with or without capital stock, organized or existing pursuant to Chapter 1 (commencing with Section
 54001) of Division 20 of the Food and Agricultural Code.

(c) Any person, corporation, association, syndicate, joint stock company, or partnership, engaged exclusively in the business of marketing agricultural, horticultural, viticultural, dairy, livestock, poultry, and bee products on a cooperative nonprofit basis.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 538, Sec. 175.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

21051.

(a) The limitations with respect to rates and charges set forth in Sections 21200 and 21200.5 do not apply to any loan of a bona fide principal amount of two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500) or more if this section is not used for the purpose of evading this division.

(b) In determining whether a loan is a loan of the principal amount of two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500), Section 22054 shall apply.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 576, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2. Pawnbroker Regulations [21200. - 21209.]

21200.

(a) Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, no pawnbroker shall charge or receive compensation at a rate exceeding the sum of the following:

(1) Three percent per month on the unpaid principal balance of any loan.

(2) A charge not exceeding three dollars ($3) a month on any loan when the monthly charge permitted by paragraph (1) would otherwise be less.

(b) One month’s interest may be charged for any part of the month in which pawned property is redeemed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 245, Sec. 1.   (SB 285)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

21200.1.

A loan setup fee of seven dollars and fifty cents ($7.50) or 3.5 percent, whichever is greater, may be charged for each loan. However, the maximum loan setup fee shall not exceed ninety dollars ($90). Loan setup fees are in addition to any other allowed charges.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 189, Sec. 1.   (AB 1186)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

21200.5.

A pawnbroker may charge as prescribed in the following schedule:
Schedule of Charges
(a) A charge not exceeding three dollars ($3) may be made on any loan for not more than three months which does not exceed nineteen dollars and ninety-nine cents ($19.99).

(b) A charge not exceeding six dollars ($6) may be made on any loan for not more than three months of twenty dollars ($20) or more, but not exceeding forty-nine dollars and ninety-nine cents ($49.99).

(c) A charge not exceeding nine dollars ($9) may be made on any loan for not more than three months of fifty dollars ($50) or more, but not exceeding seventy-four dollars and ninety-nine cents
 ($74.99).

(d) A charge not exceeding twelve dollars ($12) may be made on any loan for not more than three months of seventy-five dollars ($75) or more, but not exceeding ninety-nine dollars and ninety-nine cents ($99.99).

(e) A charge not exceeding fifteen dollars ($15) may be made on any loan for not more than three months of one hundred dollars ($100) or more, but not exceeding one hundred seventy-four dollars and ninety-nine cents ($174.99).

(f) A charge not exceeding 9 percent may be made on any loan for not more than three months on any loan of one hundred seventy-five dollars ($175) or more, but not exceeding two thousand four hundred ninety-nine dollars and ninety-nine cents ($2,499.99).

(g) The monthly charge for any extension of a written contract required by Section 21201 or 21201.5 shall be computed in accordance with the provisions of Section 21200.

(h) The schedule of charges prescribed by this section shall be posted in a place clearly visible to the general public.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 245, Sec. 3.   (SB 285)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

21200.6.

(a) In addition to other allowed charges, at the time property is redeemed or a replacement loan is issued pursuant to Section 21201.5, the pawnbroker may collect a handling, storage, and security charge for pawned articles. The maximum amount that may be charged pursuant to this section is in accordance with the following schedule:

(1) Five dollars ($5) or 2.5 percent of the loan amount for any article that can be contained within one cubic foot.

(2) Ten dollars ($10) or 2.5 percent of the loan amount for any article that cannot be contained within one cubic foot, but can be contained within three cubic feet.

(3) Twenty dollars ($20) or 2.5 percent of the loan amount for any article that cannot be contained within three cubic feet, but can be contained within six cubic feet.

(4) Thirty dollars ($30) or 2.5 percent of the loan amount for any article that cannot be contained within six cubic feet and five dollars ($5) for each additional cubic foot in excess of six cubic feet.

(b) For purposes of this section, cubic feet shall be determined by multiplying the width of an article, at its greatest width, by the depth of an article, at its greatest depth, by the height of an article, at its greatest height.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 185, Sec. 1.   (SB 1198)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

21200.7.

The maximum charge of compensation charged by a pawnbroker pursuant to the authority of Section 21200 shall be posted in a place clearly visible to the general public.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 21200.5 by Stats. 1969, Ch. 25.)
-------------------------------------------

21200.8.

In addition to other allowed charges, a pawnbroker may collect a processing charge of twenty dollars ($20) for each firearm pawned.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 189, Sec. 3.   (AB 1186)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

21200.9.

In addition to other allowed charges, a pawnbroker may collect a remote transaction fee, if the pledgor elects to request a replacement loan or to redeem a loan through electronic means, of up to 3.0 percent of the transaction amount to cover the recurring costs associated with software applications.

(History: Added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 185, Sec. 3.   (SB 1198)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

21200.10.

No licensed pawnbroker shall promise any seller of tangible personal property that the seller may repurchase property sold to the pawnbroker.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 21200.9 by Stats. 2024, Ch. 185, Sec. 2.   (SB 1198)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

21201.

(a) Every loan made by a pawnbroker for which goods are received in pledge as security shall be evidenced by a written contract, a copy of which shall be furnished to the pledgor. The loan contract shall provide a loan period that is a minimum of four months, shall set forth the loan period and the date on which the loan is due and payable, and shall clearly inform the pledgor of their right to redeem the pledge during the loan period.

(b) Every loan contract shall contain the following notice, in at least 8-point boldface type and circumscribed by a box, immediately above the space for the pledgor’s signature:

“You may redeem the property
 you have pledged at any time until the close of business on ____ [fill in date no less than four months from date loan begins]. To redeem, you must pay the amount of the loan and the applicable charges which have accrued through the date on which you redeem.” 

(c) Every pawnbroker shall retain in their possession every article pledged to them for the duration of the loan period. During that period, the pledgor may redeem the articles upon payment of the amount of the loan and the applicable charges. If the pledgor and the pawnbroker agree in writing that the pawned property may be stored off premises, following the request for redemption of the loan, the pawnbroker shall return the pledged property to the pledgor the next calendar day when both the pawnbroker’s store and the storage facility are open, not to exceed two business
 days.

(d) If any pledged article is not redeemed during the loan period as provided herein, and the pledgor and pawnbroker do not mutually agree in writing to extend the loan period, the pawnbroker shall notify the pledgor within one month after expiration of the loan period. If the pawnbroker fails to notify the pledgor within one month after the expiration of the loan period, the pawnbroker shall not charge interest from the day after the expiration of the one-month period. The pawnbroker shall notify the pledgor at the pledgor’s last
 known mailing or electronic address of the termination of the loan period, by a means for which verification of mailing or, at the sole option of the pledgor, electronic transmission of the notification can be provided by the pawnbroker, and extending the right of redemption, during posted business hours, for a period of 10 days from date of mailing or electronic transmission of that notice. Electronic notice of the termination of the loan period shall be valid if the pledgor has previously responded to an electronic communication sent by the pawnbroker to the pledgor’s last known electronic address provided by the pledgor. Upon the initiation of each new or replacement loan, the pledgor shall affirm that the current electronic address on file with the pawnbroker is valid. The 10-day notice shall state, in substantially the same format as the following: “If the tenth day falls on a day when the pawnshop is
 closed, the time period is extended to the next day that the pawnshop is open.”

(e) The posted schedule of charges required pursuant to Section 21200.5 shall contain a notice informing the pledgor that if they desire, the pawnbroker shall send the notice of termination of the loan period by registered or certified mail with return
 receipt requested, upon prepayment of the mailing costs.

(f) If any pledged article is not redeemed within the 10-day notice period, the pawnbroker shall become vested with all right, title, and interest of the pledgor, or the pledgor’s assigns, to the pledged article, to hold and dispose of as the pawnbroker’s own property. Any other provision of law relating to the foreclosure and sale of pledges shall not be applicable to any pledge the title to which is transferred in accordance with this section. The pawnbroker shall not sell any article of pledged property until they have become vested with the title to
 that property pursuant to this section.

(g) The sale of pledged property is a misdemeanor pursuant to Section 21209.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 189, Sec. 4.   (AB 1186)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

21201.1.

Whenever a pledger, or his or her assignee, loses a pawn ticket, a fee of not to exceed ten dollars ($10) may be charged for services of verifying the identification of the claimant, fingerprinting the claimant, and having the claimant execute a declaration under penalty of perjury.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 202, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

21201.2.

If the pledgor fails to redeem any pawned item during the loan period, thereby obliging the pawnbroker to mail or electronically transmit the notice required under Section 21201, the pawnbroker may charge a fee of up to seven dollars ($7) for services and costs pertaining to the preparation and mailing or electronic transmission of the notice, in addition to any other allowed charges.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 185, Sec. 4.   (SB 1198)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

21201.3.

(a) The written contract required pursuant to Section 21201 shall contain a provision in 8-point type stating whether the item or items pledged are to be stored at the business premises of the pawnbroker and adjacent to this provision, the following disclosure shall be made: “We must return your property within two business days if your property is stored off premises.”

(b) Every pawnbroker shall display a sign at his or her premises indicating whether or not
 pawned items are insured.

(c) If a pawnbroker stores pledged property at a location other than the pawnshop, the pawnbroker shall post a conspicuous sign stating that pawned items may be stored off premises with the consent of the pledgor and that following the redemption of a loan, property is required to be returned the next calendar day upon which both the pawnbroker’s store and the storage facility are open, not to exceed two business days.

(d) Notwithstanding Section 21209, a violation of this section is an infraction.

(e) This section shall become operative July 1, 1995.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 404, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

21201.4.

Charges for the first three months of any loan made pursuant to the written contract required by Section 21201 or 21201.5 shall be determined by the application of the schedule of charges contained in Section 21200.5. Charges for any extension of time following the first three months of any loan shall be determined by application of the schedule of maximum compensation contained in Section 21200.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 318, Sec. 5.   (AB 424)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

21201.5.

(a) During the contractual loan period and any extension thereof, but prior to the start of the 10-day grace period provided in subdivision (d) of Section 21201, a pledgor may request, and a pawnbroker may consent to, a replacement loan to take effect upon the expiration of the loan period stated in the active loan contract delivered to the pledgor under Section 21201 or this section.

(b) Alternatively, a pledgor may request, and a pawnbroker may consent to, a replacement loan during the 10-day grace period provided in subdivision (d) of Section 21201. Any such replacement loan shall become effective on the date it is issued.

(c) All of the following shall
 apply to a replacement loan issued pursuant to this section:

(1) The loan shall be processed as, and deemed to be, a new loan subject to all other fees and charges permitted by this chapter.

(2) Before a replacement loan may be issued, the pledgor shall pay off all outstanding charges from the prior loan then due, including interest or any loan writing, storage, notification, or other fee authorized in this chapter, in cash or another form acceptable to the pawnbroker. The pledgor’s payment may be delivered to the pawnbroker by any method acceptable to the pawnbroker, including, but not limited to, United States mail, private mail, a personal representative, or electronic transfer. If insufficient payment is tendered by the pledgor or is not tendered in cash or a form acceptable to the pawnbroker, the pawnbroker shall, if commercially reasonable, return the payment in the same
 manner that the payment was delivered by the pledgor, or by another commercially reasonable manner, within five business days, and shall include a statement advising the pledgor the reason the payment was rejected. The pawnbroker is under no obligation to enter into a replacement loan if the amount is insufficient or the method of payment or form of tender is not cash or acceptable to the pawnbroker.

(3) The unpaid balance of the prior loan shall be debited to the replacement loan on which the same article or articles have been pledged. The replacement loan contract shall disclose the amount of the prior loan that is debited and shall otherwise be consistent with Section 21201.

(4) If the pledgor requests a replacement loan in person or electronically, the pledgor’s consent to the terms of the replacement loan shall be deemed given when he or she signs the written replacement loan
 contract in person or electronically in conformity with Section 21201.6.

(5) If the pledgor requests a replacement loan by mail or through a personal representative, the pledgor’s consent to the terms of the replacement loan shall be deemed given when all required charges from the prior loan then due are paid in a form acceptable to the pawnbroker. The principal amount of a replacement loan requested by mail or through a personal representative shall not exceed the principal amount of the prior loan.

(6) The terms of the replacement loan shall be consistent with this chapter on the date the replacement loan is issued.

(7) The replacement loan shall be evidenced by a written agreement or electronic record. The pawnbroker shall mail or otherwise transmit a copy of the written agreement or electronic record to the
 pledgor within five business days following receipt of payment by means for which verification of mailing or electronic transmittal can be provided by the pawnbroker.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 417, Sec. 3.   (SB 300)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

21201.6.

The requirement for a written contract signed by the pledgor as set forth in Section 21201.5 may be met electronically if all of the following conditions are satisfied:

(a) The contract and transaction comply with the provisions of the Uniform Electronic Transactions Act, as set forth in Title 2.5 (commencing with Section 1633.1) of Part 2 of Division 3 of the Civil Code, as may be applicable at the time that the loan is entered into between the pawnbroker and the pledgor.

(b) Any written disclosures specified in this chapter to be set forth in a specified minimum type size are conspicuously presented to the pledgor prior to his or her execution of the electronic contract.

(c) The pawnbroker makes one of the following disclosures:
